District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.10

Not a franchise agreement.

This chapter shall not constitute, or be construed to comprise, a franchise agreement.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 11, 53 DCR 9122
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 11 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).